New Jersey, session 221, A5540.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  There is established in the Office of the Secretary of Higher Education the Artificial Intelligence Grant Program.  The purpose of the program shall be to make funds available to nonprofit entities providing education and training in artificial intelligence. b.    A nonprofit entity that wishes to participate in the grant program shall submit an application to the Secretary of Higher Education in a manner and form determined by the secretary. c.     In order to receive a grant, a nonprofit entity shall demonstrate that it is providing comprehensive education and training programs in artificial intelligence. d.    In awarding grants to a nonprofit entity, the secretary shall consider the following factors: (1)   the number of artificial intelligence educational and mentorship initiatives offered by the nonprofit entity; (2)   whether the nonprofit entity conducts artificial intelligence startup challenges to promote and identify budding entrepreneurs; (3)   whether the nonprofit entity organizes events that provide a platform for the exchange of ideas, networking, and educational opportunities concerning the ethical use of artificial intelligence; (4)   whether the nonprofit entity has established partnerships with government agencies to ensure collaborative growth and streamlined efforts between the State and the private sector; and (5)   whether the nonprofit entitys board members include representatives from the State, such as public institutions of higher education, women and minority owned businesses, and financial institutions. e.     Under the program, the secretary shall annually select four nonprofit entities to receive grants in an amount not to exceed $25,000 per grant. 2.    A nonprofit entity participating in the grant program shall submit a report at the conclusion of the grant period to the Secretary of Higher Education, the Governor, and, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), the Legislature containing information on the use and impact of grant funds. 3.    a.  There is established within the Office of the Secretary of Higher Education the Artificial Intelligence Education Fund.  The fund shall be used to provide grants to nonprofit entities pursuant to section 1 of this act. b.    There shall be appropriated each State fiscal year to the Artificial Intelligence Education Fund such funds as are necessary to effectuate the provisions of this act. 4.    This act shall take effect immediately.